Utah statutes.
76-6-407.   Theft of lost, mislaid, or mistakenly delivered property.
A person commits theft when:
(1)  He obtains property of another which he knows to have been lost or
mislaid, or to have been delivered under a mistake as to the identity of the
recipient or as to the nature or amount of the property, without taking
reasonable measures to return it to the owner; and
(2)  He has the purpose to deprive the owner of the property when he obtains
the property or at any time prior to taking the measures designated in
paragraph (1).
